Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4996.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 57i. (1) If a landlord or provider of housing participates in the department rent vendoring program, the landlord shall certify that the dwelling unit being provided meets all of the following requirements: (a) The dwelling unit does not have a condition that would facilitate the spread of a communicable disease. As used in this subdivision, "communicable disease" means that term as defined in section 5101 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.5101. (b) The dwelling unit is fit for human habitation. (c) The dwelling unit is not dangerous to life or health due to lack of repair of, a defect in, or the construction of a drainage source or device, plumbing, lighting, ventilation, or a heating source or device. (2) If the department is notified by an enforcing agency that a landlord or provider of housing has a violation of a housing code that constitutes a hazard to the health or safety of the occupants, the department shall terminate that landlord's or provider's participation in the rent vendoring program for the dwelling unit until the violation is corrected. (3) A landlord or provider of housing shall not evict an occupant from a dwelling unit based solely on termination of the landlord's or provider's participation in the rent vendoring program due to action taken by the department under subsection (2) or subsection (4). An occupant who is evicted in violation of this subsection may bring an action in any court having jurisdiction to recover treble damages, costs of the action, and reasonable attorney fees. (4) If the department is notified that a landlord or provider of housing is delinquent on payment of property taxes or if the title of the property reverts to the this state for nonpayment of property taxes, the department shall terminate that landlord's or provider of housing's participation in the rent vendoring program for that property. (5) Not later than 60 days after the state court administrative office creates the form required under section 4a of the truth in renting act, 1978 PA 454, MCL 554.643a, the department must have copies of the form available in its office and make the form easily accessible on its website. (6) As used in this section, "form" means the form described under section 4a of the truth in renting act, 1978 PA 454, MCL 554.643a. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. ____ (request no. H02179'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.